Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
28-65-211. Determination of incapacity — Evidence required.

The fact of minority, disappearance, or detention, or confinement by a foreign power shall be established by satisfactory evidence.

In determining the incapacity of a person for whom a guardian is sought to be appointed for cause other than minority, disappearance, or detention, or confinement by a foreign power, the court shall require that the evidence of incapacity include the oral testimony or sworn written statement of one (1) or more qualified professionals, whose qualifications shall be set forth in their testimony or written statements.

If the alleged incapacitated person is confined or undergoing treatment in an institution for the treatment of mental or nervous diseases or in a hospital or penal institution, one (1) of the professionals shall be a member of the medical staff of that hospital or institution.

The court, in its discretion, may require the presence before it of the person of the alleged incapacitated person.

The court shall fix the fees to be paid to such examiners, which shall be charged as part of the costs of the proceeding.

The costs of the proceeding shall be paid by the petitioner, who shall be reimbursed therefor out of the estate of the incapacitated person, if a guardian is appointed.

Where an incompetent brought a guardianship termination proceeding in which she requested the trial court to adjudicate and restore her competency and the evidence clearly established that the plaintiff was competent to care for herself and her home and had done so for the previous 12 years, the trial court erred in refusing to grant her request because there was no evidence that she suffered from the requisite mental incapacity or unsoundness of mind required to necessitate the appointment of a guardian, notwithstanding the fact that she was unable to properly manage her finances due to her inexperience in such matters. In re Estate of Lemley, 9 Ark. App. 140, 653 S.W.2d 141 (1983) (decision under prior law).

Nothing in the Probate Code required that the medical witnesses required under former similar statute must have examined an alleged incompetent. Sparks v. First Nat'l Bank, 242 Ark. 435, 413 S.W.2d 865 (1967) (decision under prior law).

Trial court's finding of incapacity was clearly erroneous because there was no oral testimony or sworn written statement of a qualified professional as required by subdivision (b)(1) of this section, and the medical evaluations did not establish findings with respect to adaptive behavior. Cogburn v. Wolfenbarger, 85 Ark. App. 206, 148 S.W.3d 787 (2004).

Failure to obtain a professional evaluation prior to a hearing on the appointment of a guardian was clearly erroneous; there was no oral testimony or a sworn written statement of a qualified professional. Without the required professional examination, there was insufficient evidence of the need for a guardian.Autry v. Beckham, 2014 Ark. App. 692, 450 S.W.3d 247 (2014).

Long-term care facility is defined in §20-10-101 as a nursing home, residential care facility, assisted living facility, post-acute head injury retraining and residential care facility, or any other facility which provides long-term medical or personal care. Given this statutory definition, the Supreme Court of Arkansas held that, for the purposes of subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a long-term case facility was not an institution for the treatment of mental or nervous diseases.Hale v. Coffman, 2016 Ark. 36, 480 S.W.3d 861 (2016).

In dismissing a daughter's petition for guardianship over her 84-year-old father, the circuit court erred when it concluded that the daughter was required to present oral testimony or a sworn written statement of a qualified professional who was a member of the medical staff of the long-term care facility where the father was a resident; the facility did not fall within subdivision (b)(2) of this section.Hale v. Coffman, 2016 Ark. 36, 480 S.W.3d 861 (2016).

Where original appointment of guardian without notice was invalid and guardianship was dismissed on hearing, so that no guardian was actually appointed, an examining physician was to be paid by the petitioner, and the petitioner was not entitled to reimbursement from the estate of alleged incompetent. Powers v. Chisman, 217 Ark. 508, 231 S.W.2d 598 (1950) (decision under prior law).

Pursuant to the invited-error doctrine, a guardian was precluded from arguing that a guardianship was void because it was the guardian who requested the guardianship and who failed to obtain the requisite professional evaluation; the guardian defended the validity of the guardianship when trustees attempted to have it set aside.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

Order failed to reflect that the daughter's incapacity had been established by the evidence required in this section.Hinton v. Bethany Christian Servs., 2015 Ark. App. 301, 462 S.W.3d 361 (2015).

Where the petition for appointment of the guardian merely stated that a person was unable to care for herself because of physical impairment, the probate court had no jurisdiction to appoint a guardian for such a person, at least under the law at the time of the guardianship proceeding. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979) (decision under prior law).

Extensive documentation regarding the child found in the service plan arguably qualified as an evaluation, but the service plan was not a sworn written statement and did not set out the doctor's qualifications; section 28-65-212(a)(2) requires that the evaluation be performed by a professional with expertise appropriate for the respondent's alleged incapacity, and a doctor's authorization for treatment is not a sworn written statement; therefore, the case was reversed and remanded.Kantor v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 402, 559 S.W.3d 747 (2018).

Cited: In re Bailey, 299 Ark. 352, 771 S.W.2d 779 (1989).

The respondent's medical and physical condition;

His or her adaptive behavior;

His or her intellectual functioning; and

Recommendation as to the specific areas for which assistance is needed and the least restrictive alternatives available.

The Department of Human Services shall not be ordered by any court, except the juvenile division of the circuit court, to gather records, investigate the respondent's condition, or help arrange for appropriate professional evaluations, unless the court has first determined all parties to the proceeding to be indigent and assistance provided by the department is limited to actions within the State of Arkansas.

The department shall issue rules to implement this provision.

Any existing evaluations made by the department of which the court has notice must be considered by the court.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(2).

The evaluation set forth in this section is not required to be in writing, but in determining a person's incapacity the court must require that the evidence of incapacity include the oral testimony or sworn written statement of one or more qualified professionals. In re Bailey, 299 Ark. 352, 771 S.W.2d 779 (1989).

Finding of incapacity was clearly erroneous because it did not satisfy the requirements of subsection (b). In re Bailey, 299 Ark. 352, 771 S.W.2d 779 (1989).

Trial court's finding of incapacity was clearly erroneous because there was no oral testimony or sworn written statement of a qualified professional as required by §28-65-211(b)(1) of this section, and the medical evaluations did not establish findings with respect to adaptive behavior. Cogburn v. Wolfenbarger, 85 Ark. App. 206, 148 S.W.3d 787 (2004).

Failure to obtain a professional evaluation prior to a hearing on the appointment of a guardian was clearly erroneous; there was no oral testimony or a sworn written statement of a qualified professional. Without the required professional examination, there was insufficient evidence of the need for a guardian.Autry v. Beckham, 2014 Ark. App. 692, 450 S.W.3d 247 (2014).

Circuit court had statutory authority under this section to order an independent medical evaluation of the subject of the guardianship petition; moreover, the appellate argument was waived as the order had been voluntarily complied with.Howard v. Jenkins, 2019 Ark. App. 15, 568 S.W.3d 771 (2019).

Pursuant to the invited-error doctrine, a guardian was precluded from arguing that a guardianship was void because it was the guardian who requested the guardianship and who failed to obtain the requisite professional evaluation; the guardian defended the validity of the guardianship when trustees attempted to have it set aside.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

In a guardianship case, an appellate court was able to review whether a circuit court erred by failing to obtain a professional evaluation prior to hearing, even though the argument was not raised below; moreover, the sufficiency of the evidence in a bench trial could have been raised whether or not an objection was made below.Autry v. Beckham, 2014 Ark. App. 692, 450 S.W.3d 247 (2014).

Whether petitioner for guardianship over her mother had fully complied with the statutory requirements concerning the professional evaluation was not a jurisdictional issue; therefore, because the mother had failed to raise the issue or obtain a ruling, the appellate court did not address the issue in her interlocutory appeal.Howard v. Jenkins, 2019 Ark. App. 15, 568 S.W.3d 771 (2019).

Award of final guardianship of the adult appellant to his mother and her husband was inappropriate, where a physician's affidavit attached to the emergency petition established, at best, appellant's medical and physical condition, adaptive behavior, and intellectual functioning, but did not contain any recommendation as to the specific areas for which assistance was needed and the least restrictive alternatives available as required by subdivision (b)(4) of this section.Helton v. Stogsdill (In re Helton), 2020 Ark. App. 132 (2020).

Extensive documentation regarding the child found in the service plan arguably qualified as an evaluation, but the service plan was not a sworn written statement, as required by §28-65-211 and did not set out the doctor's qualifications; subdivision (a)(2) of this section requires that the evaluation be performed by a professional with expertise appropriate for the respondent's alleged incapacity, and a doctor's authorization for treatment is not a sworn written statement; therefore, the case was reversed and remanded.Kantor v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 402, 559 S.W.3d 747 (2018).

Cited: In re Evatt, 291 Ark. 153, 722 S.W.2d 851 (1987); Kuelbs v. Hill, 2010 Ark. App. 427, 379 S.W.3d 47 (2010).

Be represented by counsel;

Present evidence on his or her own behalf;

Cross-examine adverse witnesses;

Remain silent;

Be present; and

Require the attendance by subpoena of one (1) or more of the professionals who prepared the evaluation.

Where court found that wife was clearly an incapacitated person, then even though husband was able to provide for her care, under subdivision (c)(3) a guardian should have been appointed. Deffenbaugh v. Estate of Claphan, 48 Ark. App. 208, 893 S.W.2d 350 (1995).

Cited: In re Evatt, 291 Ark. 153, 722 S.W.2d 851 (1987).

In cases involving minor children, the order may make provisions for visitation and child support as in other cases involving child custody.

Paternal grandfather could not be on the petition for guardianship with the paternal grandmother where it was revealed during the proceedings that the paternal grandmother and the paternal grandfather were not married. Bailey v. Maxwell, 94 Ark. App. 358, 230 S.W.3d 282 (2006).

The purpose of a guardian's bond is to preserve the estate of the ward. Bennett v. McGough, 281 Ark. 414, 664 S.W.2d 476 (1984) (decision under prior law).

The probate judge in a guardianship hearing was not required to make specific findings of fact as to why he did not give custody of minor children to the maternal grandparents before he appointed friends of the family as permanent guardians. Bennett v. McGough, 281 Ark. 414, 664 S.W.2d 476 (1984) (decision under prior law).

Guardianship order stated that it was temporary in nature, and the mother's claim that the word “temporary” was a typographical error was rejected; denominating a guardianship as temporary, rather than permanent, is certainly more in the nature of an exercise of judicial discretion than it is a mere mistake, and the circuit court did not err in finding that the mother was only a temporary guardian.Hinton v. Bethany Christian Servs., 2015 Ark. App. 301, 462 S.W.3d 361 (2015).

Cited: In re Evatt, 291 Ark. 153, 722 S.W.2d 851 (1987).

Cross References. Bonds not void for want of form, §16-68-204.

The purpose of a guardian's bond is to preserve the estate of the ward. Bennett v. McGough, 281 Ark. 414, 664 S.W.2d 476 (1984) (decision under prior law).

Minor should have been allowed to recover attorney fees in his action against a bank because the action sounded in contract; the bank's obligations would not have arisen had it not entered into a contract with the minor's guardian to accept funds' deposit, albeit under the statutory conditions imposed by this section. Jiles v. Union Planters Bank, 90 Ark. App. 245, 205 S.W.3d 187 (2005).

An order of a probate court authorizing a person to take charge of the property of an insane person as guardian without bond was without authority and void on its face and was subject to collateral attack, and a deed of trust executed by the guardian was void. Bank of Rector v. Parrish, 131 Ark. 216, 198 S.W. 689 (1917) (decision under prior law).

It not being doubted that under the provisions of former similar statute it was incumbent upon a guardian to give a bond when one was required by the court and it not being urged that one was not required, it had to be assumed that one was, and that being true, the ward's estate should have paid the premium. Omohundro v. Patty, 230 Ark. 252, 321 S.W.2d 746 (1959) (decision under prior law).

In a case where no bond was ever set and no letters of guardianship were ever issued, the Probate Code of 1949 did not authorize insurance company to pay guardian the proceeds on the strength of a court order conditionally appointing him guardian, with bond yet to be determined, there was no error in the chancellor's ruling that insurance proceeds were improperly paid. Prudential Ins. Co. of Am. v. Frazier, 323 Ark. 311, 914 S.W.2d 296 (1996).

Because letters of guardianship were issued to the stepmother and had not been revoked or canceled by the circuit court at the time of the insurer's disbursement of the minor daughter's portion of her father's life insurance proceeds to her stepmother as guardian, the insurer was protected by subsection (b) of this section. Therefore, summary judgment in favor of the insurer was proper.Locke v. Sinclair, 2019 Ark. App. 329, 578 S.W.3d 736 (2019).

Hospital challenging a guardianship was not entitled to vacate the original guardianship order because the amended guardianship petition sufficiently addressed the shortcomings of the original petition, and the bank, which had been appointed guardian, relied on the previous guardianship order in prosecuting the underlying medical-negligence claim on the ward's behalf.Baptist Health Med. Ctr. v. First Cmty. Bank ofBatesville, 2017 Ark. App. 671,537 S.W.3d 760 (2017).

The ward, if over fourteen (14) years of age;

The parents of the ward, if the ward is a minor;

The spouse, if any, of the ward;

Any other person who is the guardian of the person or of the estate of the ward, or any other person who has the care and custody of the ward, and the director of any agency from which the respondent is receiving services;

The Department of Human Services when the temporary guardian appointed serves as guardian of five (5) or more wards;

If there is neither a known parent nor known spouse, at least one (1) of the nearest competent relatives by blood or marriage of the ward; and

If directed by the court:

Any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state which makes or awards compensation, pension, insurance, or other allowance for the benefit of the ward or his or her estate;

Any department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this state or any charitable organization, which may be charged with the supervision, control, or custody of the incompetent; or

Any other person designated by the court.

The notice shall include:

If the ward is over fourteen (14) years of age, there shall be personal service upon him or her if personal service can be had. Service on others shall be according to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure or as otherwise provided by the court.

Notice need not be given to any person listed in § 28-65-207(a)(1)-(6).

Within three (3) working days of the entry of the temporary guardianship order, a full hearing on the merits shall be held.

The appointment may be to perform duties respecting specific property or to perform particular acts, as stated in the order of appointment.

The temporary guardian shall make such reports as the court shall direct and shall account to the court upon termination of his or her authority.

In other respects, the provisions of this chapter concerning guardians shall apply to temporary guardians, and an appeal may be taken from the order of appointment of a temporary guardian.

The letters issued to a temporary guardian shall state the date of expiration of the authority of the temporary guardian.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “Except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section” in (a)(1); and added (a)(2).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

Legislative Survey, Family Law, 16 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 131.

This section violates the due process clause of U.S. Const. Amend. 14 because it fails to provide for a safeguard hearing and meaningful notice of such a hearing. In re Evatt, 291 Ark. 153, 722 S.W.2d 851 (1987) (decision prior to 1987 amendment).

Since, in emergency situations, advance notice could defeat the purpose of this section because the incapacitated person, when given notice that a hearing was about to be held, might run away, or harm himself or herself or others, or waste his or her property before the hearing could be held, advance notice is not necessary to comply with procedural due process. In re Evatt, 291 Ark. 153, 722 S.W.2d 851 (1987) (decision prior to 1987 amendment).

A parent has a fundamental liberty interest in the care, custody, and management of his or her child. Bynum v. Savage, 312 Ark. 137, 847 S.W.2d 705 (1993).

Former similar statute was intended to take care of emergencies or instances where a delay could cause irreparable damage to the estate of an incompetent. Becker v. Rogers, 235 Ark. 603, 361 S.W.2d 262 (1962) (decision under prior law).

Where no emergency existed which would have necessitated the appointment of a temporary guardian, the doctor having stated that the incompetent's condition was improved, such an appointment was invalid as not complying with the statutory requisites of an emergency. Becker v. Rogers, 235 Ark. 603, 361 S.W.2d 262 (1962) (decision under prior law).

Where there was no showing that a delay would cause irreparable damage to the estate of an incompetent, the appointment of a temporary guardian without notice permitted by former similar statute could not be justified. Walthour-Flake Co. v. Brown, 228 Ark. 307, 307 S.W.2d 215 (1957) (decision under prior law).

Where a guardian was appointed without notice, but proceedings were not in conformity with former similar statute, and party was later held to be competent and guardianship dismissed, no temporary guardian was ever had, and petitioner could not recover court costs nor fees for guardian and attorney. Powers v. Chisman, 217 Ark. 508, 231 S.W.2d 598 (1950) (decision under prior law).

The fact that a period of 11 days elapsed between the fourth and fifth appointments of an individual for a 90-day period as a temporary guardian did not result in making the court's order valid, as such an appointment was contrary to the provisions of former similar statute. Becker v. Rogers, 235 Ark. 603, 361 S.W.2d 262 (1962) (decision under prior law).

In a guardianship case, the circuit court concluded that it had jurisdiction for the purpose of determining matters of the child's custody, and granted emergency temporary guardianship to the grandparents pursuant to this section; the circuit court reasoned that an emergency existed because (1) the mother's lifestyle created a risk of imminent danger to the child's life or health; and (2) the mother had abandoned care of the child on a number of occasions during her lifetime, and left the child most recently with his grandparents. Thus, pursuant to §9-19-204, the circuit court did not clearly err in finding that an emergency existed that warranted the circuit court's exercise of jurisdiction over the temporary emergency guardianship petition.Devine v. Martens, 371 Ark. 60, 263 S.W.3d 515 (2007), overruled, Fletcher v. Scorza, 2010 Ark. 64, 359 S.W.3d 413 (2010).

In guardianship case, the circuit court did not clearly err in finding that an emergency existed which warranted the grant of temporary emergency guardianship to a child's grandparents based on (1) the mother's lifestyle and the child's health concerns; and (2) the fact that the mother left the child with his grandparents for the last seven and a half months. The circuit court felt it was in the child's best interest to remain with his grandparents until those issues could be further examined.Devine v. Martens, 371 Ark. 60, 263 S.W.3d 515 (2007), overruled, Fletcher v. Scorza, 2010 Ark. 64, 359 S.W.3d 413 (2010).

Even if the mother had consented to the continuation of a guardianship, she had withdrawn that consent, and since she had not been found to be an unfit parent, the temporary guardianship should have automatically ended.Hood v. Hood, 2016 Ark. App. 266, 493 S.W.3d 779 (2016).

Plain reading of subdivision (a)(2) of this section provides that a temporary guardianship may last only up to 90 days, unless it is determined after a hearing that it is necessary to extend it for another period not to exceed 90 days.Hood v. Hood, 2016 Ark. App. 266, 493 S.W.3d 779 (2016).

Trial court violated subdivision (a)(2) of this section in continuing a temporary guardianship of two minor children where the guardianship had lasted more than 90 days, and no hearing to determine the propriety of an extension and whether an emergency still existed had been held.Hood v. Hood, 2016 Ark. App. 266, 493 S.W.3d 779 (2016).

Circuit court had jurisdiction, pursuant to §9-19-203, to determine matters involving the child's care, custody, and control and to determine both temporary and permanent guardianship because (1) Arkansas was the child's home state; (2) neither the child, the mother, nor the grandparents had a significant connection to California, where the original custody decision was made; (3) there was no substantial evidence in California concerning the child's care, protection, training, and personal relationships; and (4) the California court declined to exercise continuing jurisdiction.Devine v. Martens, 371 Ark. 60, 263 S.W.3d 515 (2007), overruled, Fletcher v. Scorza, 2010 Ark. 64, 359 S.W.3d 413 (2010).

It was clearly the intent of the legislature in amending former similar statute to prohibit the appointment of a temporary guardian or the retention of an individual as temporary guardian for more than 90 days. Becker v. Rogers, 235 Ark. 603, 361 S.W.2d 262 (1962) (decision under prior law).

Because a temporary guardianship expired after 90 days, the circuit court did not err as a matter of law in concluding that the mother lacked standing to challenge the adoption of the daughter's child.Hinton v. Bethany Christian Servs., 2015 Ark. App. 301, 462 S.W.3d 361 (2015).

It was error for a court to appoint a temporary guardian for one alleged to be incompetent by reason of mental incapacity “including habitual drunkenness and excessive use of drugs” on the testimony of a sister and a daughter without medical evidence. Sparks v. First Nat'l Bank, 242 Ark. 435, 413 S.W.2d 865 (1967) (decision under prior law).

Circuit court did not clearly err when it found that appellant's waiver of notice as written applied to “all proceedings” and that appellant did not intend it to be limited to only proceedings that involved the appointment of his parents as guardians to his children, as opposed to other persons; although appellant could have limited under the statute his waiver to waive notice only of specific hearings, he failed to do so.Paschall v. Paschall, 2018 Ark. App. 514, 563 S.W.3d 592 (2018).

Cited: Earle v. Bennett, 289 Ark. 448, 711 S.W.2d 829 (1986); Trammell v. Isom, 25 Ark. App. 76, 753 S.W.2d 281 (1988); Whaley v. Beckham, 2016 Ark. 196, 492 S.W.3d 65 (2016).

Before modification in a court order could be made, it had to be shown that, after the making of the original order, there had been such a change in the situation as to require, in the interest of the minor, the change to be made, or it had to be shown that material facts affecting the welfare of the child were unknown to the court when the first order was made. Thompson v. Thompson, 213 Ark. 595, 212 S.W.2d 8 (1948); Smith v. Smith, 213 Ark. 636, 212 S.W.2d 10 (1948) (decisions under prior law).

The fact that a mother was to marry a divorced man and move to Florida while an appeal was pending in the Florida courts concerning the validity of the divorce was no ground for changing custody of a child, there being no evidence of unfitness of the stepfather, since the divorce was granted by a court of competent jurisdiction and the second marriage would be prima facie legal. Thompson v. Thompson, 213 Ark. 595, 212 S.W.2d 8 (1948) (decision under prior law).

In awarding the custody of a minor child, or in modifying such an award, the chancellor had to keep in view primarily the welfare of the child. Smith v. Smith, 213 Ark. 636, 212 S.W.2d 10 (1948) (decision under prior law).

Where the evidence showed that two sisters' joint guardianship of a third sister's estate was marked by continual quarreling and bickering, the best interests of the ward demanded the termination of the guardianship, since the guardians in such circumstances were incapable of satisfactorily performing duties imposed upon them by law and the courts. Omohundro v. Erhart, 228 Ark. 910, 311 S.W.2d 309 (1958) (decision under prior law).

An order of removal could not be set aside at subsequent term. Haden v. Swepston, 64 Ark. 477, 43 S.W. 393 (1897); Wallace v. Swepston, 74 Ark. 520, 86 S.W. 398 (1905) (decisions under prior law).

This section authorizes the removal of the guardian of an estate on the court's own motion, provided the removal order complies otherwise with this section's requirements. In re Vesa, 319 Ark. 574, 892 S.W.2d 491 (1995).

Ward's claim against a debtor, his former guardian, did not arise until after the ward had obtained an order in state court removing the debtor as guardian and the ward's claim thus arose post-petition and could not be incorporated into the debtor's proposed modified plan.In re Heavner, — B.R. —, 2008 Bankr. LEXIS 3575 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. Aug. 28, 2008).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-834.

28-65-212. Evaluations.

(1)A professional evaluation shall be performed prior to the court hearing on any petition for guardianship except when appointment is being made because of minority, disappearance, detention, or confinement by a foreign power or pursuant to §28-65-218.

The evaluation shall be performed by a professional or professionals with expertise appropriate for the respondent's alleged incapacity.

The evaluation shall include the following:

(1)If no professional evaluations performed within the last six (6) months are available, the court will order an independent evaluation.

If the petition is granted, the cost of the independent evaluation will be borne by the estate of the incapacitated person. In the event the petition is denied, the costs will be borne by the petitioner.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-835; Acts 1987, No. 812, § 1; 2003, No. 368, § 1;
2019, No. 315, § 3202.

28-65-213. Hearing — Effect of determinations.

At the hearing, the respondent shall have the right to:

The burden of proof by clear and convincing evidence is upon the petitioner, and a determination of incapacity shall be made before consideration of a proper disposition.

(1)If the respondent is found to be incapacitated, the court shall determine the extent of the incapacity and the feasibility of less restrictive alternatives to guardianship to meet the needs of the respondent.

If it is found that alternatives to guardianship are feasible and adequate to meet the needs of the respondent, the court may dismiss the action.

If it is found that the respondent is substantially without capacity to care for himself or herself or his or her estate, a guardian for the person or estate, or both shall be appointed.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-835.

28-65-214. Guardianship order.

A court order establishing a guardianship shall contain findings of fact that the respondent is an incapacitated person and is in need of a guardian for the person or estate, or both. The order may limit the power and duties of the guardian and may define the legal and civil rights retained by the incapacitated person.

If satisfied that a guardian should be appointed, the court shall appoint one (1) or two (2) general or limited guardians of the person or estate, or both, but not more than one (1) guardian of the person shall be appointed unless they are husband and wife.

The order shall specify the nature of the guardianship and the amount of the bond to be given.

If the court determines the guardians should be limited, the order shall set forth the specific powers, authorities, and duties the guardian shall possess, which may be stated in terms of powers or rights the incapacitated person may exercise without intervention of the guardian.

In defining the powers and duties of the guardian, the court shall consider the right of the incapacitated person to rely upon nonmedical remedial treatment in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing in lieu of medical care.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, §§ 16, 17; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 57-835, 57-836; Acts 2003, No. 760, § 1.

28-65-215. Bond of guardian.

If the guardianship is to be of the person only, the amount of the bond shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or the court may dispense with the bond.

At every accounting, the court shall inquire into the sufficiency of the bond and of the sureties, and, if either or both are found insufficient, the guardian shall be ordered to file a new or additional bond.

If, by the terms of a will, the testator expresses the wish that no bond be required of the person whom he or she requests to be appointed guardian, that person may be relieved of giving a bond with respect to property given by the will to the incapacitated person.

Section 28-48-201 et seq. with respect to the bonds of personal representatives shall be applicable to the bonds of guardians, except that in fixing the amount of the guardian's bond, the value of the real property, as distinguished from the income arising therefrom, unless it is sold, shall not be taken into consideration and shall not constitute property which may reasonably be expected to pass through the hands of the guardian.

Further, when the ward's estate is all in cash, the court may dispense with the bond if the guardian deposits the entire estate on interest in a bank in Arkansas insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or in a savings and loan association in Arkansas insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or in a credit union in Arkansas insured by the National Credit Union Administration and the value of the estate is not greater than the amount of the maximum insurance provided by law for a single depositor, and the bank or savings and loan association shall file with the probate clerk of the circuit court an agreement not to permit any withdrawal from the deposit except on authority of a circuit court order.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-837; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 281.

28-65-216. Issuance of letters.

When a guardian has given such bond as may be required and the bond has been approved, as provided by §28-48-205, or if no bond is required and the guardian has filed his or her written acceptance of his or her appointment, letters of guardianship under the seal of the court shall be issued to him or her.

The letters, when so issued, until revoked or cancelled by the court, shall protect persons who, in good faith, act in reliance thereon.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-838.

28-65-217. Form of letters.

Letters of guardianship shall be in substantially the following form:

In the Circuit Court of
County, Arkansas. In the Matter of CD, an Incapacitated Person (a Minor) No.
LETTERS OF GUARDIANSHIP Be it known that AB, whose address is
, having been duly appointed guardian of the person and estate (person/estate) of CD, an incapacitated person (a minor) and having qualified as such guardian, is hereby authorized to have the care and custody of and to exercise control over the person and to take possession of and administer the property (have the care and custody of and to exercise control over the person) (to take possession of and administer the property) of said incapacitated person (minor), as authorized by law. Dated this
day of
, 20 . Probate Clerk of the Circuit Court of
County, Arkansas. (SEAL)

Click to view form.

If the powers, authorities, or duties of the guardian are limited, the letters shall state that fact, clearly and in bold print, by including the word “limited” in the title and by inserting the word “limited” between the words “duly” and “appointed” in the body of the letters.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-839; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 282.

28-65-218. Temporary guardian.

(1)Except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, if the court finds that there is imminent danger to the life or health of the incapacitated person or of loss, damage, or waste to the property of an incapacitated person and that this requires the immediate appointment of a guardian of his or her person or estate, or both, the court may, with or without notice, appoint a temporary guardian for the incapacitated person for a specified period, which period, including all extensions, shall not exceed ninety (90) days, and the court may remove or discharge him or her or terminate the guardianship.

(A)If the incapacitated person is a minor, the initial period for the appointment of a temporary guardian shall be for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days.

(i)However, on or before the expiration of the ninety-day period, the court may extend the temporary guardianship for an additional period not to exceed ninety (90) days if the court finds after a hearing on the merits that there remains imminent danger to the life or health of the minor if the temporary guardianship is not extended.

Notice of the hearing shall be given before the hearing as required by subsections (b)-(d) of this section. However, notice is not required with respect to a person whose whereabouts are unknown or cannot by the exercise of reasonable diligence be ascertained.

Immediate notice of the temporary guardianship order shall be served by the petitioner upon the following:

A copy of the petition;

A copy of the temporary order and order of appointment;

Notice of a hearing date; and

A statement of rights as provided in §28-65-207(b)(1).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-840; Acts 1987, No. 535, § 1; 1993, No. 1295, § 1; 2011, No. 9, § 1.

28-65-219. Substitution — Removal.

When a minor ward has attained fourteen (14) years of age, his or her guardian may be removed on petition of the ward to have another person appointed guardian if the court is satisfied that the person chosen is suitable, qualified, and competent and that it is for the best interest of the ward that such a person be appointed.

A guardian may also be removed on the same grounds and in the same manner as provided in §28-48-105 for the removal of a personal representative.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-841.

28-65-220. Successor guardian.

When a guardian dies, is removed by order of the court, or resigns and the resignation is accepted by the court, the court may appoint another guardian in his or her place in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as are provided in this chapter for an original appointment of a guardian.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-842.